Washington statutes.
RCW 41.12.150

Deceptive practices, false marks, etc., prohibited.

No commissioner or any other person shall, by himself or herself, or in cooperation with one or more persons, defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person in respect of his or her right of examination or registration according to the rules and regulations of this chapter, or falsely mark, grade, estimate or report upon the examination or proper standing of any person examined, registered or certified pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or aid in so doing, or make any false representation concerning the same, or concerning the person examined, or furnish any person any special or secret information for the purpose of improving or injuring the prospects or chances of any person so examined, registered or certified, or to be examined, registered or certified or persuade any other person, or permit or aid in any manner any other person to personate him or her, in connection with any examination or registration of application or request to be examined or registered.

[ 2007 c 218 s 16; 1937 c 13 s 16; RRS s 9558a-16.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.